Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2804YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 631 Section 1. Section 455B.276, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. The director shall issue a variance to 3 any state agency, county, or city for backwater requirements 4 for bridge construction or repair if the director receives 5 from all affected landowners who have not provided the state 6 agency, county, or city with a flooding easement a written 7 acknowledgment stating that each affected landownerâs property 8 will be subject to flooding during and after the construction 9 or repair. 10